Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5009.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5009.6. A. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall
examine the feasibility of a state plan amendment to the Oklahoma
Medicaid Program for diabetes self-management training (DSMT).
B. By December 1, 2018, the Authority shall submit a report to
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives and the Governor estimating the potential costs to
the state, clinical findings, reviews of pilot projects and research
from other states on the effects of DSMT on persons with a diabetes
diagnosis.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1383 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. Beginning July 1, 2019, and subject to the availability of
funding and receipt of any necessary federal approval, the Oklahoma
Health Care Authority shall draft a state plan amendment for DSMT
cover diabetes self-management education and support (DSMES) under
the state Medicaid program for persons with a diabetes diagnosis.
The provisions of this subsection shall only apply if the report
required by subsection B of this section demonstrates DSMT to be
evidence-based and essential to qualifying participants in the
Oklahoma Medicaid Program.
D. As used in this section, “diabetes self-management training
(DSMT)” means the process of facilitating the knowledge, skill and
ability necessary for diabetes self-care. This process requires
incorporating the patient’s unique needs and experiences into an
individualized education and support plan that promotes new
behaviors and solutions, including, but not limited to, healthy
eating, physical activity, self-monitoring and medication use.
B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board shall promulgate
rules as necessary to implement this section including, but not
limited to, rules on provider eligibility and requirements, scope of
services, coverage, and reimbursement.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
February 9, 2026 - DO PASS


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1383 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)